test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-marangyTS_gt-norm.yaml
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюд
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюда
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюнаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюнась
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдась
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдась
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюнинзь
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдинзь
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдинзь
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюнаць
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдаць
     мараӈга+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мараӈгахаюдонзь
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгын
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгыд
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгыда
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгыниʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгыдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгыдиʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгынаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгыдаˮ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мараӈгыдоʼ
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгынась
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгыдась
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгыдась
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгынинзь
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгыдинзь
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгыдинзь
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгынаць
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгыдаць
     мараӈга+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мараӈгыдонзь
     мараӈга+N+Tra: мараӈгаӈэ
     мараӈга+N+Car: мараӈгасиˮ
     мараӈга+N+Equ: мараӈгадремʼ
     мараӈга+N+Equ+Lat: мараӈгадревʼ
